Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. In General [Repealed]

§§ 17-7-101 through 17-7-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, see chapter 19 of this title, especially §

17-19-1803

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. II, §§ 1 through 12; Laws 1915, ch. 34, §§ 1 through 3; and Laws 1973, ch. 112, § 1; related to charitable, educational, religious and other societies.